Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-774
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Center for Student Leadership and Expanded Learning Act:

(1) Career and technical education means educational programs that support the development of knowledge and skill in the following areas: Agriculture, food, and natural resources; architecture and construction; arts, audiovisual, technology, and communication; business management and administration; education and training; finance; government and public administration; health science; hospitality and tourism; human services; information technology; law, public safety, and security; marketing; manufacturing; science, technology, engineering, and mathematics; and transportation, distribution, and logistics;

(2) Career education student organization means an organization for individuals enrolled in a career and technical education program that engages career and technical education activities as an integral part of the instructional program; and

(3) Expanded learning means school-based or school-linked activities and programs that utilize school-community partnerships to expand opportunities for students to participate in educational activities outside the normal classroom.

Laws 2009, LB476, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB1066, § 11.